District of Columbia statutes.
16-2825

Mediation statements.

(a)

Each party shall submit a confidential mediation statement to the mediator no later than 10 days prior to the initial mediation session. The parties shall not send copies of the mediation statement to the clerk, the assigned judge, or the other parties.

(b)

Unless not already stated in the complaint and answer, the mediation statement shall:

(1)

Include a brief summary of facts;

(2)

Identify the issues of law and fact in dispute and summarize the party’s position on those issues;

(3)

Discuss whether there are issues of law or fact the early resolution of which could facilitate early settlement or narrow the scope of the dispute;

(4)

Identify the attorney who will represent the party at the mediation session and the person with settlement authority who will attend the mediation session;

(5)

Include any documents or materials relevant to the case which may assist the mediator and advance the purposes of the mediation session; and

(6)

Present any other matters that may assist the mediator and facilitate the mediation.

(c)

Mediation statements are intended solely to facilitate the mediation and shall not be filed with the court.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807